apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
						непреходен (няма мин стр прич)-->
	<pardef n="см/ее__vblex"> <!-- imperf"/><s n="iv -->
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ей</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ейте</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ея</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ееш</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ее</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еем</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR"> 	   <p>          <l>ееме</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еете</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еят</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>еех</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ееше</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ееше</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еехме</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еехте</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ееха</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>еел</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еела</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еело</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еели</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещ</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещия</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещият</l>       <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ееща</l>       <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещата</l>     <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещо</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещото</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещи</l>       <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еещите</l>     <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ях</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>я</l>           <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>я</l>           <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яхме</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яхте</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яха</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ял</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>елия</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>елият</l>       <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яла</l>       <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялата</l>     <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яло</l>          <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялото</l>        <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ели</l>       <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>елите</l>     <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>еейки</l>         <r>ее<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>



	<!-- 1 спрежение, аорист на -ЯХ -->
	<!--  несвършен вид
	 					съкратена сегашна основа
						преходен -->

<e lm="живее"><i>жив</i><par n="см/ее__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="смее се"><i>см</i><par n="см/ее__vblex"/><p><l><b/>се</l><r><g><b/>се</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="смее"><i>см</i><par n="см/ее__vblex"/></e>
